West Virginia, session 2026, HB4707.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 7. COUNTY COMMISSIONS AND OFFICERS. Article 28. Hotel and Motel homeless housing vouchers. §7-28-1. Hotel and motel homeless housing vouchers; participation; prohibition; definitions. (a) A county may not require a hotel or motel to participate in any program that houses homeless individuals or families in an unoccupied hotel or motel guest rooms through the use of a housing voucher.(b) For purposes of this section:"Homeless individuals or families" means individuals who lack fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence or who have a primary nighttime residence in a shelter, on the street, in a park, in a vehicle, or in an enclosure that is not authorized for human habitation.  "Hotel" or "motel" means an establishment that provides payment for temporary lodging in the form of overnight accommodations in guest rooms to transient patrons. CHAPTER 8. MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS. Article 40. Hotel and Motel homeless housing vouchers. §8-40-1. Hotel and motel homeless housing vouchers; participation; prohibition; definitions. (a) A city or town may not require a hotel or motel to participate in any program that houses homeless individuals or families in an unoccupied hotel or motel guest rooms through the use of a housing voucher.(b) For purposes of this section:"Homeless individuals or families" means individuals who lack fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence or who have a primary nighttime residence in a shelter, on the street, in a park, in a vehicle, or in an enclosure that is not authorized for human habitation.  "Hotel" or "motel" means an establishment that provides payment for temporary lodging in the form of overnight accommodations in guest rooms to transient patrons. CHAPTER 16. PUBLIC HEALTH. Article 15. State Housing Law. §16-15-26. Hotel and motel homeless housing vouchers; participation; prohibition; definitions. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may not require a hotel or motel to participate in any program that houses homeless individuals or families in an unoccupied hotel or motel guest rooms through the use of a housing voucher.(b) For purposes of this section:"Homeless individuals or families" means individuals who lack fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence or who have a primary nighttime residence in a shelter, on the street, in a park, in a vehicle, or in an enclosure that is not authorized for human habitation.  "Hotel" or "motel" means an establishment that provides payment for temporary lodging in the form of overnight accommodations in guest rooms to transient patrons.